Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-6835
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Out-of-Network Emergency Medical Care Act, the definitions found in sections 44-6836 to 44-6846 apply.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 2.
January 1, 2021